Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2475.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-9.1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-9.1 entitled
"Maintenance of Private Easements and Rights-Of-Way" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-9.1-2. Maintenance of private easement and rights-of-way.
(a) In the absence of an enforceable, written agreement to the contrary, the owner of any
residential real property that benefits from an easement or right-of-way, the purpose of which is to
provide access to the residential real property, shall be responsible for the cost of maintaining the
easement or right-of-way in good repair and the cost of repairing or restoring any damaged portion
of the easement or right-of-way. The maintenance shall include, but not be limited to, the removal
of snow from the easement or right-of-way.
(b) In the absence of an enforceable, written agreement, the cost of maintaining and
repairing or restoring the easement or right-of-way shall be shared by each owner of a benefited
property in proportion to the benefit received by each property; provided, that the market value or
assessed valuation of each such property shall not be taken into consideration in the calculation of
benefit received.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, any owner of
a benefited property or any owner of a burdened property who directly or indirectly damages any
portion of the easement or right-of way shall be solely responsible for repairing or restoring the
portion damaged by that owner.

(d) If any owner of a benefited or burdened property refuses to repair or restore a damaged
portion of an easement or right-of-way in accordance with this section, or fails, after a demand in
writing, to pay the owner’s proportion of the cost of maintaining or repairing or restoring the
easement or right-of-way in accordance with subsection (b), an action for specific performance or
contribution may be brought in the superior court against the owner by other owners of benefited
or burdened properties, either jointly or severally.
(e) In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this section and an agreement
described in subsections (a) or (b) of this section, the terms of the agreement shall control.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004227/SUB A
========
LC004227/SUB A - Page 2 of 3